Massachusetts, session 194th, H982.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 150A of the Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence in the twenty-first
paragraph the following sentences:-
Personnel or authorized agents of the department may at all reasonable times enter any
premises, public or private, for the purpose of investigating, sampling or inspecting any records,
condition, equipment, practice or property relating to activities subject to this section, and may at
any time enter such premises for the purpose of protecting the public health or safety, or to
prevent damage to the environment. For the purposes of such entries no warrant shall be required
provided, however, that upon demand by the owner or person in control of such premises, a
warrant authorizing such entry and inspection shall be sought after such demand. Any court,
judge, or justice authorized to issue warrants in criminal cases may issue such warrants.
of 1